Massachusetts, session 194th, H405.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 193 of Chapter 112 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2020
Official Edition is hereby amended by striking out the first and second paragraphs and inserting
in place thereof the following paragraph: -
Each state certified general, state certified residential, or state licensed real estate
appraiser must retain originals or true copies of all written contracts engaging his services for
real property appraisal work and all reports and supporting data assembled and formulated by the
appraiser in preparing such reports for a period of at least five years after preparation or at least
two years after final disposition of any judicial proceeding in which the appraiser provided
testimony related to the assignment, whichever period expires last.
of 2

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
of 2